Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.086

Child molestation in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of child molestation in the second degree when the person has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another who is at least twelve years old but less than fourteen years old and the perpetrator is at least thirty-six months older than the victim.

(2) Child molestation in the second degree is a class B felony.

[ 2021 c 142 s 6; 1994 c 271 s 304; 1988 c 145 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 142: See note following RCW 9A.44.050.

Intent—1994 c 271: See note following RCW 9A.44.010.

Purpose—Severability—1994 c 271: See notes following RCW 9A.28.020.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.